Washington statutes.
RCW 8.12.500

Liability of treasurer.

If the treasurer shall receive any moneys for assessments, giving a receipt therefor, for any property and afterwards return the same as unpaid, or shall receive the same after making such return, and the same be sold for assessment which has been so paid and receipted for by himself or herself or his or her clerk or assistant, he or she and his or her bond shall be liable to the holder of the certificate given to the purchaser at the sale for the amount of the face of the certificate, and a penalty of fifteen percent additional thereto besides legal interest, to be demanded within two years from the date of the sale and recovered in any court having jurisdiction of the amount, and the city shall in no case be liable to the holder of such certificate.

[ 2011 c 336 s 271; 1907 c 153 s 44; RRS s 9259. Prior: 1905 c 55 s 44; 1893 c 84 s 44.]